Vermont, session 2025-2026, S147.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 4237a is added to read:
§ 4237a. PURCHASING DRUGS FROM A PERSON UNDER 21 YEARS
OF AGE
No person shall knowingly and unlawfully purchase a regulated drug from a
person under 21 years of age. A person who violates this section shall be
sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not less than one year and not more
than five years in addition to any other penalty provided by law.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #381879 v.1